Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.190

Structural pest inspector.

Any person licensed under this chapter who is not also licensed as a pest inspector under chapter 15.58 RCW shall only refer in his or her report to rot or conducive conditions for wood destroying organisms and shall refer the identification of or damage by wood destroying insects to a structural pest inspector licensed under chapter 15.58 RCW.

[ 2008 c 119 s 19.]